Wisconsin, session 2025, AB69.
do enact as follows:AB69,13Section 1. 77.54 (30) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB69,1,5477.54 (30) (a) 2. Electricity and natural gas sold during the months of 5November, December, January, February, March and April for residential use.AB69,21Section 2. Effective date.AB69,2,32(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 2nd month beginning after 3publication.AB69,2,44